Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.410

Ex officio treasurer of district.

The county treasurer of the county in which the headquarters office of the educational service district is located shall serve as the ex officio treasurer of the district. The treasurer shall keep all funds and moneys of the district separate and apart from all other funds and moneys in the treasurer's custody and shall disburse such moneys only upon proper order of the educational service district board or superintendent.

[ 1990 c 33 s 289; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 36; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 21. Formerly RCW 28A.21.200, 28.19.595.]

NOTES:

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.